Indiana, session 2026, SB147.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 7.1-3-19-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.220-2023,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) This section applies to a permit issued
under IC 7.1-3-20-16(d), IC 7.1-3-20-16(g), IC 7.1-3-20-16(k) through
IC 7.1-3-20-16(q), or IC 7.1-3-20-16.8, or IC 7.1-3-20.1 if a municipal
legislative body has adopted an ordinance requiring a formal written
commitment as a condition of eligibility for a permit, as described in
subsection (b).
(b) As a condition of eligibility for a permit, the applicant must
enter into a formal written commitment with the municipal legislative
body regarding the character or type of business that will be conducted
on the permit premises. The municipal legislative body must adopt an
ordinance approving the formal written commitment. A formal written
commitment is binding on the permit holder and on any lessee or
proprietor of the permit premises. When an application for renewal of
a permit is filed, the applicant shall forward a copy of the application
to the municipal legislative body. The municipal legislative body shall
2026 IN 147—LS 6579/DI 87


receive notice of any filings, hearings, or other proceedings on the
application for renewal from the applicant.
(c) A formal written commitment may be modified by the municipal
legislative body with the agreement of the permit holder.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (f), the amount of time that a
formal written commitment is valid may not be limited or restricted.
(e) A formal written commitment is terminated at the time a permit
is revoked or not renewed.
(f) If the character or type of business violates the formal written
commitments, the municipality may adopt a recommendation to the
local board and the commission to:
(1) deny the permit holder's application to renew the permit; or
(2) revoke the permit holder's permit.
(g) The commission shall consider evidence at the hearing on the
issue of whether the business violated the formal written commitments.
If the commission determines there is sufficient evidence that the
commitments have been violated by the permittee, the commission
may:
(1) deny the application to renew the permit; or
(2) revoke the permit;
as applicable.
SECTION 2. IC 7.1-3-20.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 20.1. Transit Development Districts
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "board" means the governing
body appointed under IC 36-7.5-2-3 for the northwest Indiana
regional development authority.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "district" means a transit
development district established under IC 36-7.5-4.5.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "legislative body" means the
legislative body of a municipality in which a district is located.
Sec. 4. A permit authorized by this chapter may be issued
without regard to the quota provisions of IC 7.1-3-22.
Sec. 5. (a) The commission may issue new three-way permits to
an applicant who is a proprietor, as owner or lessee, or both, of a
restaurant located within a district.
(b) The municipality may adopt an ordinance requiring a
permit applicant to enter into a formal written commitment under
IC 7.1-3-19-17 as a condition of eligibility for being issued a permit
under this chapter.
Sec. 6. The ownership of a permit issued under this chapter and
2026 IN 147—LS 6579/DI 87


the location for which the permit was issued may not be
transferred.
Sec. 7. Notwithstanding IC 7.1-3-1.1, if business operations cease
at the permit premises for more than six (6) months the:
(1) permit reverts to the commission; and
(2) permit holder is not entitled to any refund or other
compensation.
Sec. 8. The legislative body and the board must enter into a
written agreement that sets forth the maximum number of new
permits that may be issued within the district under this chapter.
The legislative body must send a copy of the executed agreement to
the commission.
Sec. 9. If a permit issued under this chapter is later revoked or
not renewed, the commission may issue another new permit, as
long as the total number of active permits issued under this chapter
does not exceed the maximum number of permits set forth in the
written agreement at any time.
Sec. 10. (a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c), the
maximum number of new permits may be increased or reduced by
executing a new written agreement following the same procedure
set forth in section 8 of this chapter.
(b) The number of permits may not be reduced below the
number of active permits issued to the district under this chapter
at the time the new written agreement is executed.
(c) The maximum number of permits issued under this chapter
may not be increased or reduced by the legislative body and board
for four (4) years after a written agreement is executed.
2026 IN 147—LS 6579/DI 87